Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Treatment of Juvenile Sexual Offenders

208.800.
Pilot program for treatment of juvenile sexual offenders. [Repealed.]

208.805.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

208.810.
Referral of juvenile to program for at least two years — Reports — Review — Discharge, review. [Repealed.]

208.815.
Cabinet for Human Resources to design program. [Repealed.]

208.820.
Agreements with public and private agencies. [Repealed.]

208.825.
Data — Report. [Repealed.]

208.830.
Juvenile sex offender treatment board. [Repealed.]

208.835.
Members of board. [Repealed.]

208.840.
Council for social services to assume board duties in 1992. [Repealed.]

208.845.
Duties of board. [Repealed.]

208.850.
File of offenders to be maintained — Information, biannual report on whether juvenile participants later committed sex-related offenses. [Repealed.]